Illinois, session 104th, HB1215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Utilizing Illinois Energy Resources Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Utilizing Illinois Energy Resources Task Force.7    (a) The Utilizing Illinois Energy Resources Task Force is 8created to study methods the State can use to support and 9expand the use of natural resources in this State, including 10coal, crude oil, and natural gas.11    (b) The Task Force shall include the following members:12        (1) the Director of Natural Resources, or the 13    Director's designee, who shall serve as the ex officio 14    chairperson of the Task Force;15        (2) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 16    of Representatives;17        (3) one member appointed by the President of the 18    Senate;19        (4) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 20    House of Representatives;21        (5) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 22    Senate; and23        (6) the following members appointed by the Governor:  HB1215- 2 -LRB104 05011 BDA 15039 b1            (A) one member representing an entity engaged in, 2        or seeking to be engaged in, the extraction of coal in 3        the State;4            (B) one member representing an entity engaged in, 5        or seeking to be engaged in, the extraction of crude 6        oil in the State;7            (C) one member representing an entity engaged in, 8        or seeking to be engaged in, the extraction of natural 9        gas in the State; and10            (D) one member representing the agriculture 11        community.12    (c) The Department of Natural Resources shall provide 13administrative and other support to the Task Force.14    (d) The Director of Natural Resources may retain the 15services of outside parties with legal, engineering, and 16financial expertise to assist the Task Force in carrying out 17its duties.18    (e) Task Force members are not eligible to receive 19compensation or reimbursement of expenses. 20    Section 10. Report on Utilizing Illinois Energy Resources 21legislation. 22    (a) The Task Force shall file a report no later than 23December 31, 2026 with the General Assembly on all issues 24deemed appropriate by the Task Force, including, but not 25limited to, the following:  HB1215- 3 -LRB104 05011 BDA 15039 b1        (1) land use issues;2        (2) regulatory reform;3        (3) transportation issues; and4        (4) environmental issues.5    (b) The Task Force shall be abolished upon filing its 6report with the General Assembly. 7    Section 15. Repealer. This Act is repealed on June 1, 82027. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.